Missouri, session 2026, HB1778.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.810, to read as follows:
1.810. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Religious Freedom Protection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Place of worship", a building or grounds where activities of religious groups
are conducted;
(2) "Public official", any elected or appointed officer, employee, or agent of the
state of Missouri or any political subdivision, board, commission, bureau, or other
public body thereof.
3. No public official shall issue an order that has the effect of limiting or
prohibiting religious groups from holding religious services or meetings.
4. No public official shall issue an order that has the effect of limiting or
prohibiting places of worship from holding religious services or meetings.
5. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not apply to religious
groups using places of worship to knowingly commit or plan to commit acts of violence
or harm.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1778 2
6. The provisions of subsections 3 and 4 of this section shall not be interpreted to
exclude places of worship from complying with applicable building and fire codes.
✔